North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 15. North Carolina Consumer Finance Act.

§ 53-164.
Title.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the North Carolina Consumer Finance Act.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to effect of secured transaction provisions of Uniform Commercial Code, see

G.S. 25-9-201

.

§ 53-165.
Definitions.

“Amount of the loan” shall mean the aggregate of the cash advance and the charges authorized by

G.S. 53-173

and

G.S. 53-176

.

“Borrower” shall mean any person who borrows money from any licensee or who pays or obligates himself to pay any money or otherwise furnishes any valuable consideration to any licensee for any act of the licensee as a licensee.

“Cash advance” shall mean the amount of cash or its equivalent that the borrower actually receives or is paid out at his discretion or on his behalf.

“Commission” shall mean the State Banking Commission.

“Commissioner” shall mean the Commissioner of Banks.

“Deputy commissioner” shall mean the deputy commissioner of banks.

“License” shall mean the certificate issued by the Commissioner under the authority of this Article to conduct a consumer finance business.

“Licensee” shall mean a person to whom one or more licenses have been issued.

“Loanable assets” shall mean cash or bank deposits or installment loans made as a licensee pursuant to this Article or installment loans made as a licensee pursuant to the Article which this Article supersedes or such other loans payable on an installment basis as the Commissioner of Banks may approve, or any combination of two or more thereof.

“Person” shall include any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation.

History.

1957, c. 1429, s. 1; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 2001-519, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Agency Theory:
Still Viable? Dynamic Regulation of the Financial Services Industry,”
see 48 Wake Forest L. Rev. 791 (2013).

§ 53-166.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Scope of Article; evasions; penalties; loans in violation of Article void.

Scope. — No person shall engage in the business of lending in amounts of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less and contract for, exact, or receive, directly or indirectly, on or in connection with any such loan, any charges whether for interest, compensation, consideration, or expense, or any other purpose whatsoever, which in the aggregate are greater than permitted by Chapter 24 of the General Statutes, except as provided in and authorized by this Article, and without first having obtained a license from the Commissioner. The word “lending” as used in this section, shall include, but shall not be limited to, endorsing or otherwise securing loans or contracts for the repayment of loans.

Evasions. — The provisions of subsection (a) of this section apply to any person who seeks to avoid its application by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever. Devices, subterfuges, and pretenses include any transaction in which a cash rebate or other advance of funds is offered and all of the following apply:

The cash advance is made contemporaneously with the transaction or soon thereafter.

The amount of the cash advance is required to be repaid at a later date.

The selling or providing of any item, service, or commodity with the transaction is incidental to, or a pretext for, the advance of funds.

Penalties; Commissioner to Provide and Testify as to Facts in His Possession. — Any person not exempt from this Article, or any officer, agent, employee, or representative thereof, who fails to comply with or who otherwise violates any of the provisions of this Article, or any regulation of the Banking Commission adopted pursuant to this Article, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each violation shall be considered a separate offense. It is the duty of the Commissioner of Banks to provide the district attorney of the court having jurisdiction of any offense under this subsection with all facts and evidence in the Commissioner’s actual or constructive possession, and to testify as to these facts upon the trial of any person for the offense.

Additional Penalties. — Any contract of loan, the making or collecting of which violates any provision of this Article, or regulation thereunder, except as a result of accidental or bona fide error of computation is void, and the licensee or any other party in violation shall not collect, receive, or retain any principal or charges whatsoever with respect to the loan. If an affiliate operating in the same office or subsidiary operating in the same office of a licensee makes a loan in violation of G.S. 53-180(i), the affiliate or subsidiary may recover only its principal on the loan.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1957, c. 1429, s. 8; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, ss. 13, 14; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 1042, s. 1; 1979, c. 33, s. 1; 1985, c. 154, ss. 6, 13; 1987, c. 444, s. 3; 1989, c. 17, ss. 1, 13; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 881, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 425; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2006-243, s. 2; 2013-162, s. 1.

§ 53-166.
Scope of Article; evasions; penalties; loans in violation of Article void.

Scope. — No person shall engage in the business of lending in amounts of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less and contract for, exact, or receive, directly or indirectly, on or in connection with any such loan, any charges whether for interest, compensation, consideration, or expense, or any other purpose whatsoever, which in the aggregate are greater than permitted by Chapter 24 of the General Statutes, except as provided in and authorized by this Article, and without first having obtained a license from the Commissioner. The word “lending” as used in this section, includes, but is not limited to, endorsing or otherwise securing loans or contracts for the repayment of loans.

Evasions. — Subsection (a) of this section applies to any person that seeks to avoid its application by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever. Devices, subterfuges, and pretenses include any transaction in which a cash rebate or other advance of funds is offered and all of the following apply:

The cash advance is made contemporaneously with the transaction or soon thereafter.

The amount of the cash advance is required to be repaid at a later date.

The selling or providing of any item, service, or commodity with the transaction is incidental to, or a pretext for, the advance of funds.

Penalties; Commissioner to Provide Facts and Testify. — Any person not exempt from this Article, or any officer, agent, employee, or representative thereof, that fails to comply with or that otherwise violates any of the provisions of this Article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each violation is a separate offense. The Commissioner shall provide the district attorney of the court having jurisdiction of any offense under this subsection with all facts and evidence in the Commissioner’s actual or constructive possession and shall testify as to these facts upon the trial of any person for the offense.

Additional Penalties. — Any contract of loan, the making or collecting of which violates any provision of this Article, or rule thereunder, except as a result of accidental or bona fide error of computation is void, and the licensee or any other party in violation shall not collect, receive, or retain any principal or charges whatsoever with respect to the loan. If an affiliate operating in the same office or subsidiary operating in the same office of a licensee makes a loan in violation of G.S. 53-180(i), the affiliate or subsidiary may recover only its principal on the loan.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1957, c. 1429, s. 8; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, ss. 13, 14; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 1042, s. 1; 1979, c. 33, s. 1; 1985, c. 154, ss. 6, 13; 1987, c. 444, s. 3; 1989, c. 17, ss. 1, 13; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 881, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 425; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2006-243, s. 2; 2013-162, s. 1; 2021-84, s. 1.

§ 53-167.
Expenses of supervision.

For the purpose of defraying necessary expenses of the Office of Commissioner of Banks for supervision, each licensee shall pay to the Commissioner an assessment not to exceed eighteen dollars ($18.00) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of assets, or fraction thereof, plus a fee of three hundred dollars ($300.00) per office; provided, however, a consumer finance licensee shall pay a minimum annual assessment of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00). The assessment shall be determined on a consumer finance licensee’s total assets as shown on its report of condition made to the Commissioner as of December 31 of each year, or the date most nearly approximating that date. If the Commissioner determines that the financial condition or manner of operation of a consumer finance licensee warrants further examination or an increased level of supervision, the licensee may be subject to assessment not to exceed the amount determined in accordance with the schedule set forth in this section.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1957, c. 1429, s. 1; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 2012-56, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 11, effective October 1, 2012, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “Each licensee, for the purpose of defraying necessary expenses of the Commissioner of Banks and his agents in supervising them, shall pay to the Commissioner of Banks the fees prescribed in G.S. 53-122 at the times therein specified.”

§ 53-168.
License required; showing of convenience, advantage and financial responsibility; investigation of applicants; hearings; existing businesses; contents of license; transfer; posting.

Necessity for License; Prerequisites to Issuance. — No person shall engage in or offer to engage in the business regulated by this Article unless and until a license has been issued by the Commissioner of Banks, and the Commissioner shall not issue any such license unless and until the Commissioner finds:

That authorizing the applicant to engage in such business will promote the convenience and advantage of the community in which the applicant proposes to engage in business; and

That the financial responsibility, experience, character and general fitness of the applicant are such as to command the confidence of the public and to warrant the belief that the business will be operated lawfully and fairly, within the purposes of this Article; and

That the applicant has available for the operation of such business at the specified location loanable assets of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

Investigation of Applicants. — Upon the receipt of an application, the Commissioner shall investigate the facts. If the Commissioner determines from such preliminary investigation that the applicant does not satisfy the conditions set forth in subsection (a), the Commissioner shall so notify the applicant who shall then be entitled to an informal hearing thereon provided he so requests in writing within 30 days after the Commissioner has caused the above-referred to notification to be mailed to the applicant. In the event of a hearing, to be held in the offices of the Commissioner of Banks in Raleigh, the Commissioner shall reconsider the application and, after the hearing, issue a written order granting or denying such application. At the time of making such application, the applicant shall pay the Banking Department the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) as a fee for investigating the application, which shall be retained irrespective of whether or not a license is granted the applicant.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-519, s. 2, effective January 1, 2002.

Required Assets Available. — Each licensee shall continue at all times to have available for the operation of the business at the specified location loanable assets of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The requirements and standards of this subsection and subsection (a)(2) of this section shall be maintained throughout the period of the license and failure to maintain such requirements or standards shall be grounds for the revocation of a license under the provisions of

G.S. 53-171

of this Article.

License, Posting, Continuing. — Each license shall state the address at which the business is to be conducted and shall state fully the name of the licensee, and if the licensee is a copartnership, or association, the names of the members thereof, and if a corporation, the date and place of its incorporation. Transfer or assignment of a license by one person to another by sale or otherwise is prohibited without the prior approval of the Commissioner. Each license shall be kept posted in the licensed place of business. Each license shall remain in full force and effect until surrendered, revoked, or suspended as hereinafter provided.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 15; 1973, c. 1042, s. 2; 1981, c. 671, s. 15; 1987, c. 827, s. 12; 2001-519, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1982 law on commercial law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1018 (1983).

§ 53-169.
Application for license.

The application for license shall be made on a form prepared and furnished by the Commissioner of Banks and shall state:

The fact that the applicant desires to engage in business under this Article; and

Whether the applicant is an individual, partnership, association or corporation; and

The name and address of the person who will manage and be in immediate control of the business; and

The name and address of the owners and their percentage of equity in the company, except when the Commissioner does not deem it feasible to furnish such information because of the number of stockholders involved; and

When the applicant proposes to commence doing business; and

Such other information as the Commissioner of Banks deems necessary.

The statements made in such application shall be sworn to by the applicant or persons making application on the applicant’s behalf.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

§ 53-170.
Locations; change of ownership or management.

Business Location. — A licensee may conduct and carry on his business only at such location or locations as may be approved by the Commissioner of Banks, and no changes shall be made from one location to another without the approval of the Commissioner.

Additional Places of Business. — Not more than one place of business shall be maintained under the same license, but the Commissioner may issue more than one license to the same licensee upon compliance with all the provisions of this Article governing issuance of a single license.

Change of Location, Ownership or Management. — If any change occurs in the name and address of the licensee or of the president, secretary or agent of a corporation, or in the membership of any partnership under said sections, a true and full statement of such change, sworn to in the manner required by this Article in the case of the original application, shall forthwith be filed with the Commissioner.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

§ 53-171.
Revocation, suspension or surrender of license.

If the Commissioner shall find, after due notice and hearing, or opportunity for hearing, that any such licensee, or an officer, agent, employee, or representative thereof has violated any of the provisions of this Article, or has failed to comply with the rules, regulations, instructions or orders promulgated by the Commission pursuant to the powers and duties prescribed therein, or has failed or refused to make its reports to the Commissioner, or has failed to pay the fees for its examination and supervision, or has furnished false information to the Commissioner or the Commission, the Commissioner may issue an order revoking or suspending the right of such licensee and such officer, agent, employee or representative to do business in North Carolina as a licensee, and upon receipt of such an order from the Commissioner, the licensee shall immediately surrender his license to the Commissioner. Within five days after the entry of such an order the Commissioner shall place on file his findings of fact and mail or otherwise deliver a copy to the licensee. Any licensee who fails to make any loans during any period of 90 consecutive days after being licensed shall surrender his license to the Commissioner.

Any licensee may surrender any license by delivering it to the Commissioner with written notice of its surrender, but such surrender shall not affect his civil or criminal liability for acts committed prior thereto.

No revocation, suspension or surrender of any license shall impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and any obligor.

The Commissioner, in his discretion, may reinstate suspended licenses or issue new licenses to a person whose license or licenses have been revoked, or surrendered if and when he determines no fact or condition exists which clearly would have justified the Commissioner in refusing originally to issue such license under this Article.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

§ 53-172.
Conduct of other business in same office.

No licensee shall conduct the business of making loans under this Article within any office, suite, room, or place of business in which any other business is solicited or transacted.Installment paper dealers as defined in

G.S. 105-83

, the collection by a licensee of loans legally made in North Carolina or another state by another government regulated lender or lending agency, and the collection by a licensee of claims of, payments to, or payments for an insurance company licensed in North Carolina and arising in any way from a nonfiling or nonrecording insurance policy approved by the Commissioner of Insurance shall not be considered as being any other business within the meaning of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Commissioner may authorize in writing the solicitation and transaction of other business in any office, suite, room, or place of business in which a licensee is conducting the business of making loans if the Commissioner determines that the other business would not be contrary to the best interests of the borrowing public.

The Commissioner may require, consistent with the provisions of 12 C.F.R. Part 226 (Regulation Z) of the federal Truth-In-Lending Act, the other business authorized under subsection (b) of this section to:

Disclose the cost of consumer credit of goods and services sold; and

Provide the purchaser with a reasonable cancellation period for goods and services purchased.

No licensee shall:

Make the purchase of goods and services sold under the authorization of subsection (b) of this section a condition of making a loan; or

Consider the borrower’s decision to purchase, or not purchase, goods and services sold under the authorization of subsection (b) of this section a factor in its approval or denial of credit, or in its determination of the amount of or terms of credit for the borrower.

The licensee shall notify the borrower in writing that the purchase of the goods and services offered under the authorization under subsection (b) of this section is voluntary and that the borrower’s decision whether or not to purchase the goods and services will not affect the licensee’s decision to grant credit or the amount of or terms of the credit granted.

If, at any time, the Commissioner has reason to believe that the conduct of any other business authorized under this section is contrary to the best interests of the borrowing public, the Commissioner shall hold a hearing pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes to determine whether or not to revoke the authority to conduct that business. The Commissioner shall revoke the authority to conduct any other business if he or she finds that the conduct of any other business authorized under this section is contrary to the best interests of the borrowing public.

This section shall not be construed as authorizing the collection of any loans or charges in violation of the prohibitions contained in

G.S. 53-190

.

The books, records, and accounts relating to loans shall be kept in such manner as the Commissioner of Banks prescribes as to delineate clearly the loan business from any other business authorized by the Commissioner.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1967, c. 769, s. 1; 1971, c. 1212; 1981, c. 464, s. 2; 1985, c. 154, ss. 7, 8, 9; 1987, c. 444, ss. 2, 3; 1989, c. 17, ss. 2, 13; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 765, s. 1; 2013-162, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-162, s. 2, effective July 1, 2013, in the second paragraph of subsection (a), deleted “and” following “G.S. 105-83”, inserted “and the collection by a licensee of claims of, payments to, or payments for an insurance company licensed in North Carolina and arising in any way from a nonfiling or nonrecording insurance policy approved by the Commissioner of Insurance” and made a minor punctuation change

§ 53-173.
Computation of interest; application of payments; limitation on interest after judgment; limitation on interest after maturity of the loan.

, (a1) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-162, s. 3, effective July 1, 2013.

Computation of Interest. — Interest on loans made pursuant to this section shall not be paid, deducted, or received in advance. Such interest shall not be compounded but interest on loans shall (i) be computed and paid only as a percentage of the unpaid principal balance or portion thereof and (ii) computed on the basis of the number of days actually elapsed; provided, however, if part or all of the consideration for a loan contract is the unpaid principal balance of a prior loan, then the principal amount payable under the loan contract may include any unpaid interest on the prior loan which have accrued within 90 days before the making of the new loan contract. For the purpose of computing interest, a day shall equal 1/365th of a year.

(b1)

Application of Payments. —

Any payment made on a loan shall be applied first to late charges and other permissible charges under this Article, then to any accrued interest, and then to principal. Any portion or all of the principal balance may be prepaid at any time without penalty.

Limitation on Interest after Judgment. — If a money judgment is obtained against any party on any loan made under the provisions of this section neither the judgment nor the loan shall carry, from the date of the judgment, any interest in excess of eight percent (8%) per annum.

Limitation of Interest after Maturity of Loan. — After the maturity date of any loan contract made under the provisions of this section and until the loan contract is paid in full by cash, new loan, refinancing or otherwise, no charges other than interest at eight percent (8%) per annum shall be computed or collected from any party to the loan upon the unpaid principal balance of the loan.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 17, s. 3.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-519, s. 3, effective January 1, 2002.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, ss. 13, 17-22; 1973, c. 1042, s. 3; 1975, c. 110, s. 1; 1979, c. 33, s. 2; 1981, c. 561, ss. 1-3; 1983, c. 68, s. 1; c. 126, s. 13; 1989, c. 17, s. 3; 2001-519, s. 3; 2013-162, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-162, s. 3, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Computation of interest; application of payments” for “Maximum rate of interest and fee; computation of interest” in the section heading; deleted subsections (a) and (a1); deleted the last sentence in subsection (b) which read: “Any payment made on a loan shall be applied first to any accrued interest and then to principal, and any portion or all of the principal balance may be prepaid at any time without penalty.”; and added subsection (b1).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on usury law in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 76 (1969).

For note on choice of law rules in North Carolina, see 48 N.C.L. Rev. 343 (1970).

For note discussing the appropriate disclosure of inconsistent federal and state requirements with regard to credit terms, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 793 (1979).

§ 53-173.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 17, s. 4.

§ 53-173.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 110, s. 2.

§ 53-174.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 17, s. 4.

§ 53-175.
Fee for returned checks.

A licensee may collect the fee for returned checks to the extent permitted by

G.S. 25-3-506

. This section shall apply to any loan made by any licensee under this Article.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 23; 1981, c. 561, s. 4; 1983, c. 68, s. 1; c. 126, s. 12; 1989, c. 17, s. 5; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 742, s. 21.

§ 53-176.
Rates, maturities and amounts.

A licensee may make installment loans in aggregate amounts not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and which shall not be repayable in fewer than 12 months or more than 96 months and which shall not be secured by deeds of trust or mortgages on real estate and which are repayable in substantially equal consecutive monthly payments and to charge and collect interest in connection therewith which shall not exceed the following actuarial rates:

With respect to a loan not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), thirty percent (30%) per annum on that part of the unpaid principal balance not exceeding four thousand dollars ($4,000), twenty-four percent (24%) per annum on that part of the unpaid principal balance exceeding four thousand dollars ($4,000) but not exceeding eight thousand dollars ($8,000), and eighteen percent (18%) per annum on that part of the remainder of the unpaid principal balance.

With respect to a loan exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), eighteen percent (18%) per annum on the outstanding principal balance.Interest shall be contracted for and collected at the single simple interest rate applied to the outstanding balance that would earn the same amount of interest as the above rates for payment according to schedule.

In addition to the interest permitted in this section, a licensee may assess at closing a fee for processing the loan as agreed upon by the parties, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for loans up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and one percent (1%) of the cash advance for loans above two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), not to exceed a total fee of forty dollars ($40.00), provided that such charges may not be assessed more than twice in any 12-month period.

The provisions of G.S. 53-173(b), (b1), (c) and (d) and G.S. 53-180(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h) and (i) shall apply to loans made pursuant to this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-162, s. 4, effective July 1, 2013.

The due date of the first monthly payment shall not be more than 45 days following the disbursement of funds under any such installment loan. A borrower under this section may prepay all or any part of a loan made under this section without penalty. Except as otherwise provided for pursuant to

G.S. 75-20(a)

, no more than twice in a 12-month period, a borrower may cancel a loan with the same licensee within three business days after disbursement of the loan proceeds without incurring or paying interest so long as the amount financed, minus any fees or charges, is returned to and received by the licensee within that time.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-162, s. 4, effective July 1, 2013.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 12.1; 1981, c. 561, s. 7; 1983, c. 68, s. 1; c. 126, ss. 14, 15; 1989, c. 17, s. 6; 1995, c. 155, s. 1; 2001-519, s. 4; 2013-162, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-162, s. 4, effective July 1, 2013, deleted “Optional” in the section catchline; rewrote subsection (a); inserted “(b)(1)” near the beginning of (c); and deleted subsections (d) and (f).

§ 53-176.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 17, s. 4.

§ 53-177.
Fees.

Recording Fees. — The licensee may collect from the borrower the amount of any fees necessary to file or record its security interest with any public official or agency of a county or the State as may be required pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 25 of the General Statutes or

G.S. 20-58

et seq. Upon full disclosure to the borrower on how the fees will be applied, such fees may either (i) be paid by the licensee to such public official or agency of the county or State or (ii) in lieu of recording or filing, applied by the licensee to purchase nonfiling or nonrecording insurance on the instrument securing the loan; provided, however, the amount collected by the licensee from the borrower for the purchase of a nonfiling or nonrecording insurance policy shall be the premium amount for such insurance as fixed by the Commissioner of Insurance. Such premium shall be at least one dollar ($1.00) less than the cost of recording or filing a security interest. Provided further, a licensee shall not collect or permit to be collected any notary fee in connection with any loan made under this Article, nor may a licensee collect any fee from the borrower for the cost of releasing a security interest except such fee as actually paid to any public official or agency of the county or State for such purpose.

Late Fees. —

A licensee may charge a late payment fee for any payment which remains past due for 10 days or more after the due date.

No licensee may charge a late payment fee in an amount greater than fifteen dollars ($15.00) nor charge a late payment fee more than once with respect to a single late payment.

If a late payment fee has been once imposed with respect to a particular late payment, no such fee shall be imposed with respect to any future payment which would have been timely and sufficient but for the previous default.

Deferral Charges. — A licensee may, by agreement with the borrower, collect a deferral charge and defer the due date of all or part of one or more installments under an existing loan contract as permitted in the provisions of

G.S. 25A-30

.

Insurance Policy. — If a licensee, in lieu of recording, collects a fee to purchase a nonfiling or nonrecording insurance policy as authorized under subsection (a) of this section, to be valid, any claim arising from such policy shall only be used to compensate the licensee for damages arising from failure to record or file its security interest in accordance with Article 9 of Chapter 25 of the General Statutes. Following payment of such claim, the licensee shall do the following:

Properly credit the full claim amount posted to the balance of the loan effective the date the proceeds were received.

Close the loan account and cease collection efforts on any loan that was paid in full by a claim.

Provide the borrower written notice, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, that (i) the claim has been partially paid or paid in full and (ii) to the extent the loan is subject to the insurance company’s subrogation rights, instructions about direction of future payments.

Cancel of record or properly credit, as appropriate, any judgments against the borrower arising from the loan and, if the judgment has been paid in part, file a certificate of partial satisfaction.

Accurately report any account adjustments to any credit bureau used by the licensee.

Recovery of Costs. — If a borrower requests in writing of the lender to take a voluntary dismissal of an action to recover a loan made under this Article, and both parties agree to such a dismissal, the lender shall obtain in writing from the borrower an acknowledgment that (i) the borrower will be liable for the statutory court costs and (ii) any other reasonable and bona fide costs incurred in the course of bringing the action, and the lender may recover the statutory court costs incurred as well as any other reasonable and bona fide costs incurred in the course of bringing the action. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the collection of attorney fees otherwise prohibited by G.S. 53-180(e). Provided further, that this section shall not apply if the borrower, in written documentation raises an affirmative defense to an action to collect a loan under this Article. Nothing in this section shall in any way affect or prohibit a magistrate, judge, or arbitrator from awarding filing fees and fees for service of process incurred by the lender in bringing the civil action if a judgment is awarded or the other bona fide costs set forth above and the recovery of said costs and fees is expressly authorized in the event judgment is entered against the borrower.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1989, c. 17, s. 7; 2000-169, s. 36; 2013-162, s. 5; 2015-179, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-162, s. 5, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section heading, which formerly read “Recording Fees”; redesignated the formerly undesignated provisions of this section as subsection (a); in subsection (a), added “Recording Fees” in the subsection heading, and, in the second sentence, deleted “or (iii) be retained by a licensee that elects to self insure against the loss of a security interest by reason of not filing or recording its security instrument” preceding “provided” and deleted “or for self insurance” following “insurance policy” and made minor punctuation changes; and added subsections (b) through (d).

Session Laws 2015-179, s. 1, effective September 1, 2015, added subsection (e).

§ 53-177.1.
Electronic transaction fees.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Affiliate. — In relation to a licensee, an entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under joint control with the licensee.

Control. — Any of the following:

Own, directly or indirectly, at least fifty percent (50%) of the capital of an entity.

Have the power to direct or cause the direction of the management of and set the policies of an entity.

In addition to the recovery of other costs allowed under this Article, a licensee may collect from a borrower an amount not to exceed the actual cost of any fees charged by a non-affiliate third party for the following transactions:

Online debit card payments to the borrower’s account.

In-person debit card payments to the borrower’s account.

Automated clearinghouse transaction payments to the borrower’s account.

Disbursement of loan proceeds via automated clearinghouse transactions.

Disbursement of loan proceeds via prepaid debit cards or stored value cards.

Disbursement of loan proceeds via electronic payments to the borrower’s account at a financial institution or financial services company.

A licensee shall make available to borrowers at least one type of transaction for an account payment and at least one type of transaction for a disbursement of loan proceeds in which it will not seek to recover the cost of third-party fees associated with the transaction.

A licensee shall publish on its website and publicly display at all its retail locations a disclosure on whether a borrower will be charged for any third-party fees with regard to each available type of transaction for account payments and disbursements of loan proceeds. A licensee shall also provide this information as a separate disclosure to a borrower when the borrower establishes a loan account with the licensee.

Nothing in this section prohibits a borrower from directly paying transaction-based fees to a non-affiliate third party for account payments and disbursements of loan proceeds.

History.

2021-159, s. 1(a).

§ 53-178.
No further charges; no splitting contracts; certain contracts void.

No further or other charges or insurance commissions shall be directly or indirectly contracted for or received by any licensee, affiliate, parent, subsidiary, or licensee under the same ownership, management, or control, whether partial or complete, except those specifically authorized by this Article, by the Commissioner under

G.S. 53-172

or any other statute. No licensee shall divide into separate parts any contract made for the purpose of or with the effect of obtaining interest or charges in excess of those authorized by this Article. All balances due to a licensee from any person as a borrower or as an endorser, guarantor or surety for any borrower or otherwise jointly or severally, shall be considered a part of any loan being made by a licensee to such person for the purpose of computing interest or charges, or exceeding the maximum amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 765, s. 2; 2015-179, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-179, s. 2, effective September 1, 2015, in the first sentence, inserted “affiliate, parent, subsidiary, or licensee under the same ownership, management, or control, whether partial or complete” and added “or any other statute”; inserted “interest or” in the second sentence; in the third sentence, deleted “or due from any husband or wife” preceding “jointly” and added “or exceeding the maximum amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000)”; and made related changes.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on usury law in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 761 (1969).

§ 53-179.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-179, s. 3, effective September 1, 2015.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 13; 1973, c. 1042, s. 6; 1981, c. 561, ss. 5, 6; 1983, c. 68, s. 1; repealed by 2015-179, s. 3, effective September 1, 2015.